[Daily Discussion] Saturday, July 14, 2018 -- TITLE
#New post: [\[Daily Discussion\] Sunday, July 15, 2018 →](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8yz36i/daily_discussion_sunday_july_15_2018/)
I have now gone from "wow this looks ready to go down" to "if it hasn't gone down yet I'm not sure if it will" to "I can't believe it hasn't gone up yet" lol

if we're still here in like 7 days I'll probably switch it up yet again 
Thought I'd share this:

[Where we are now in terms of percentage distance from the long term support line as compared to 2014/2015 bear market](https://www.tradingview.com/x/9wfY6QaO/)

I should add that even in a $3k btc scenario, I don't believe we'd get there as expediently as the bar patterns overlaid as it would require moving below $20k log line and *big* uptick in volatility - both of which are unlikely. 


Anyone out here around the passage to the hollow earth in Antarctica, want to meet up talk about crypto and toss pennies into the abyss
Yeah, all this chop isnt really good for my health and productivity. Going back to BTC from Tether since I think speculation on the ETF approval will provide a run up near August.

Peace out reddit! Detoxing from crypto news/updates for a while.
Sentiment analysis: confusion
I just scalped mere 70 usd from fibo to fibo on that last stupid 30m candle. It's doing retarded movements, so I am doing retarded trades. 70 USD are 70 USD.
Anyone here wanna BBQ at my uncle's farm, pick corn, and chat crypto HMU
We are up 1.5% guys, cue up the reversal posts.
Was that both a 6300 and a 6200 test?
Yesterday's dump didn't push below $6100, and the longer it lingers in here, the more potential there is for another bullish impulse.  I'm out of trade, and will only open a position if move above $6400 or below the prior low.  

[Something like this](https://www.tradingview.com/x/0YuA7JRi/)

At $6200 we're smack in the middle of this range and for me it's unclear where things will go in the short term... and with volatility dropping these moves will likely be slower until some major interstitial is breached.


****

It's difficult for me to imagine this bear market ending without at least one visit into the $4k range.  If I recall correctly there's an unresolved long pole at $4.4k that matches up with the 0.786 fib retracement from last bubble's low.  

[Chart](https://www.tradingview.com/x/7P6sc0NE/)

In this bearish scenario, $4.4k may end up being the bottom before a return to the mean, as the the longer this bear market extends over time, the mean support line continues to creep up in price.  It's unlikely to take place before mid-August as it would otherwise violate the log trend line support from $20k.

We also haven't had any secondary capitulation events since the Feb low, and this would serve as a final shakeout before a long accumulation period in the $5k range leading into next year.  

Bears looking for $3k coins would need to push price aggressively and relentlessly down the log trend line from $20k and into mid September where it intersects with the long term mean support line.  This would mirror the 2014 decline in some ways.

[Chart](https://www.tradingview.com/x/1FkQCX07/)

Sub $3k prices would need to violate the long term support which seems unlikely.


****

Of course, there's always the possibility that *this* is the bottom. I dig the analysis synthesized by u/jarederaj which [projects price from periods of stability.](https://www.tradingview.com/chart/BTCUSD/EwsyTSJs-Projecting-From-Stability/)  All prior bubbles managed to make long term bullish impulses after volatility waned with 2014 being the only exception.
Finally gotten around to update my bitcoin all-time log chart.

For anyone interested, this is all the price history bitcoin has to my knowledge.

https://imgur.com/a/xdTvIOM
This isn't about bulls or bears. The Bogdanoff pretty much fucked everyone in the last month. Me too, certainly. I'm out of the market (in btc, but not long or short) until this comes to senses. If it dumps, I'll maybe sell a bit at 6k to cover the expenses for the next year and then long the bottom, if I see it.

Upd. I know it's a trading sub, but really, if I just hodled, I'd have 3x as much. Trading is a really bad drug for 99% of people.
The close of the weekly low (6150) looks like it is getting defending by bulls. Here's a 4 hour chart: https://imgur.com/a/u5BcRAU

RSI looks like it's coming up from over sold. Needs to get over 6400 to actually look bullish. Bears will try to defend 6300 most likely.
This whole "100%+ retrace of the move" thing is the most annoying thing to happen to Bitcoin since Barts.
I'm happy to report that [the BBQ](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8yqktp/daily_discussion_saturday_july_14_2018/e2dhk14/?context=3) was great. Thanks for reminding me about the halloumi cheese u/Hotsoccerman, it was brilliant!

The market looks more drunk than me right now... Sir, when Wyckoff spring please? :P
Today's volume has been the lowest of 2018. It's kinda exciting to see how all of this will playout, it 
will be certainly interesting to look back on these days a few years from now.

The last time the volume was this low was early- mid November 2017, the price was ranging from 5800-7800 USD.

Also worth noting the last time Bitcoin was this stable was from August to September 2017.
I don’t think I’ve seen this mentioned, but I’m seeing hidden bearish RSI divergence on the 4 hour. I’m on my phone, so charting is rough, but on Bitstamp:

July 11 20:00 UTC $6380 / RSI 37.22
July 13 12:00 UTC $6259 / RSI 38.25

It’s also setting up for a continuation of the divergence if we fail to make a higher high. A close above $6260 would invalidate that one though.

Chart (can’t put a line on the oscillator on my phone but you can see the higher RSI highs corresponding lower highs on price): https://www.tradingview.com/x/jqTCVnHW/

I wouldn’t open a position over this, but something to keep an eye on.

"Sell in may and go away"..... In July, you should Buy?
Anyone here live in or currently travelling through Dublin? I'm here for the weekend if anyone wants to have a pint and chat crypto. 
Closed my long at $6,260 for a negligible gain. Switching to a short momentarily. 

Buyers are proving to be incredibly impotent in this range and MACD and MA are starting to look bearish on the 1d.

Edit: opened a short at around $6255. Will close it if buyers can break through resistance around $6,350. 
LUL what, not sure if that is a fake out or just a huge sell off when we passed 6k3.
Low trading volume and volatility. What does this mean?
The institutional money is sure taking its time.
Drunk people trading on a saturday evening...
It’s been like 3 or 4 days without action and I’m already in max pain. Calling months of sideways is just sadistic 
I don’t even know where we are going anymore. Am I trading bonds. 😴
Resistance in bitcoin is around ~6300 but it is not visible on the BTCUSD chart. You can see the defining conjuncture in this chart: https://imgur.com/a/0hVM2Z8

So we either flip 12H and breakout. Or back to bearish offloading of coins.

The resistance is visible on a line in BCHUSD: https://imgur.com/a/1uxLWAx

Volume is drying up, suggesting the end of an era (the bearish one is my opinion): https://imgur.com/a/l5a2avW

This bearish candle has the highest volume of all. Might suggest a strong rejection of the continuation of the bull market. I really wonder how I missed that one before: https://imgur.com/a/h5zgCfP

Or on the bright side it might suggest that 6k is a solid level. And whale have waited until all retails who are willing have emptied their pockets. Thus we are close to the end of this bear move and explosive upward move.

TL;DR: don't know wtf am talking about.
Bullish still imo

https://uk.tradingview.com/chart/BTCUSD/YyANA9ZJ-wyckoff-and-IH-S/

predicted this bounce and drop pretty well, being following this formation for a couple weeks
Closing my long from 6130 now. I admit that this is a bit pre-mature, especially because I had a decent entry. But these are the things I'm looking at:

- bear pennant
- hidden bear divs on the 2-4H charts
- order books provide more liquidity for short positions right now (i.e. more liquidity on the bid side)

https://www.tradingview.com/x/7YzXu8X0/

While I'm closing my leveraged position but will remain 1x long on cold storage.

I think the pure risk/return will still favour a long position here. But I'm gonna be hanging out at the pool with some BBQ tonight and I rather not baby sit a leveraged position.
Coinbase burn lol

[https://twitter.com/altcoin\_io/status/1017904432439128064](https://twitter.com/altcoin_io/status/1017904432439128064)

Edit: Kraken is at it too [https://twitter.com/krakenfx/status/1017933203875622914](https://twitter.com/krakenfx/status/1017933203875622914)
So, I’ve been playing around with my indicators on strange timeframes, and to my surprise, the 5D chart yielded distinctly accurate DeMark counts. I’m going with this…

I think we’ll see a small run in the near future to ~8771 — where the 5D kijun aligns with TDST resistance. For this to happen, the current 5D candle, which is working on a bullish price flip, cannot close below 6148. Doing so would erase the bullish price flip, and we’d likely descend into a 4k test sometime in August (which seems like an eventuality even if we rally a bit here). If we start to see some life, I'd take profits when the 5D chart is on TD sell 5 (an eyeball of where/when price would meet TDST resistance/kijun).

https://www.tradingview.com/x/JpF34niS/

tl;dr - I am forecasting a bounce to 8771 then a 4k test in August based on DeMark and Ichimoku.

6H cloud just had a bearish TK cross: https://www.tradingview.com/x/BqWQnNqP/

I'm hedging here at $6260.
I don't have any short positions open but I'm honestly shocked we're above $6,000 still.
Some [hopium](http://prntscr.com/k6cgkn) for the bulls...

Ive drawn two lines here. The green line is the log support that bitcoin has had since 2011, and the purple line has served as a point of resistance and support many, many times in Bitcoin's history. (*Note: I drew the purple line really sloppily, if you tilt it up slightly more, its pretty obvious that its acted as a major point of resistance and support in the past, many times. My second image below is more accurately drawn*)

Assuming this downtrend continues without a further bounce, the point at the green line is around 4650 USD and the point at the purple line is 5700 USD. Bitcoin has not historically spent much time under this purple line, its bounced under it a few times, and stayed under it at the conclusion of the 2014 bear market, for about 8 months. I don't think its likely that we will spend much time under this purple line this time around and I certainly don't think its likely we'll breach the green line and go under 4650 USD as that would break bitcoin's literal strongest support, I think it would take a exceptional push down because of some sort of bad news to have the momentum to break that green line. 

Given that we're still above 6000 dollars which surprises even me, I don't think the market has the momentum to go under the purple line and stay under there for a prolonged period of time. The bottom is probably going to a V shaped wick down below that purple line at 4800-5200.

[Here](http://prntscr.com/k6ckac) is a closer look. Note that *if* we continue sideways, we will collide into the purple trend on August 6, and probably the green trend at the end of November. I still think we'll see the bottom before mid September if $5765 wasn't the bottom (I really doubt it was)

**Edit: [here](http://prntscr.com/k6covr) is a more accurate representation of the purple line and all the times its acted as support and resistance** At the very least we can see that Bitcoin really does not like being below this line. The first time it went below it in 2015, it bounced right out strongly, and in 2016 it made 2 failed attempts to get above it, with the 3rd attempt succeeding. 
everyone keeps bringing up the ETF, I don't think that is going to happen, I was just reading a rant about it on twitter and the guy summarize it really [good](https://twitter.com/Crypto_Macro/status/1017804370191273985), the TLDR concerns that the SEC has:

-unregulated markets

-prevention of manipulative practices

-protecting investors, retail investors in particular

-impact of volatility

-impact of fragmentation

-liquidity of funds


All key to analyzing the probability of approval of a bitcoin ETF.


The market is just asleep and not acting as quickly as I was expecting it to do, I added a stop loss with enough room on my shorts so I can sleep tight.

Rising channel. I'm guessing it'll either make a small bounce, or we won't see these levels for a long time.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/EEOgQz7P/
Daily volume is very low today and it is likely to be the second daily inside bar, tomorrows daily could be a big move. I would like to get on the right side of that move. Stop orders on todays high and low could be a good momentum trade, the problem with that is with all the recent stop hunts u might get chopped up. Might be better to wait for an hourly close outside of 6150-6400 (6300?) to take a position. Thoughts?
is there still a chance for an Inverse H&S here or has it been invalidated already?
I know people like to throw big numbers around, but remember numbers and % don't scale together. Meaning, a drop to 4k is 33% drop for example, just like 15k to  10k.  

My feelings is % down for each 1k is getting slower and slower. 

So I'll post something here since this is a rather slow day. 

I'm sure everyone knows of the IH&S pattern that's been forming, and according to the chart I've drawn, we need to close above $6800 by the 18th to make the pattern a valid one. I'm looking forward to it.

https://imgur.com/ifPnR0l

Edit: Actually, it's possible the right shoulder extends a bit longer, but in any case, the price must close above $6800 sometime around next week. Does not have to be on the 18th :)
If I had to guess where the next move is going over the coming month, I'd say once we break this pennant from January we will see one more charge at 10k and then a higher low in the low 8ks and up from there until we get rejected or break ath. With volume still decreasing on the weekly, a previous rejection at ~6k 3 times, and other big sellers supply exhausted, the trend moves more in the favor of bulls. Hell even some obscure alt could do what ETH did last year and jumpstart a run. I'll not be surprised if i'm wrong but it seems like this could be a likely scenario. 
Isn’t the slow bleed and capitulation towards $4k range what we expected? $4k represents a -80% drop from ATH and isn’t unreasonable compared with previously bubble pops off previous ATH.

Our slow bleed might not last as long as the one in 2014, but this seems like the start of slowly bleeding into capitulation, something we haven’t really experienced yet. 

We went from $19k to $5.8k in Feb, and had several big pumps after  that never really amounted to anything. We haven’t had any big dump yet below $5.8k either. Why is anything other than a final slow bleed to capitulation below $5.8k to be expected and why isn’t this mentioned on here more often as the most likely scenario? 
I think we are in the spring building stage now. 

$6,300 gets rejected over and over again, and every time we just come back up while painting a higher low. 

sooner or later the floodgates will open, and up it goes.




Okidoki steady so far in weekend. Seen different last weekends. 
I do not buy in weekends... many times not much volume.. uncertainty. 
Let's see how we start Monday.
How do you guys feel about this:

> This feels very uncomfortable to say, but $BTC $GBTC is fast becoming a reliable LEADING indicator of liquidity in the markets.

https://twitter.com/GameSetTrade/status/1016850980216999936

> - Crypto is a trade on liquidity and excess speculation.. and once FEDs QT program gets going.. the fed is going to DESTROY crypto land"... now 7 months later.. most down 70-90%

https://twitter.com/Bamabroker/status/1016874997716078593
*Silently hopes and remembers last saturday*

more seriously, I like that again the 6250 range seems quite stable for now
Sorry to anyone tracking my trades on positionbot. Just wanted to give my mentality on these scalp  shorts. I’m still making small profits on them, but using more of my stack than I’d like to on them.

Alts have been bleeding overall the past few day while BTC has remained constant. We are sitting over support around $5800 and $5300, with the former log resistance-turned-support line from ATH slightly below those.

While normally I would like to just hold a short here and ride it for a dump, this ETF news concerns me, along with the the interesting CMF consolidation shared yesterday and the hidden bull div on the 12Hr (?) time scale.

Don’t get me wrong, I still think we have yet to find the long-term bottom. However, considering how quick the mood changed in here from a BGD followed by “consensus pump” rumors and talks of a reversal, I might wait this out for a bit to see how these ETF rumors affect the price. I still think it will turn out to be another big fakeout, but no point in scalping heavy shorts here with a potential pump n’ dump coming, bitcoin style.

In short, I still think this is going down eventually, but I may hold off on shorting for a bit in case this ETF pump goes off.
I’m looking at $6200 to take a short term position and make a quick buck while I waste my time on Saturday. I think we drop soon and if we bounce at $6200, I will go long. If we don’t, then short. I’m looking at the hourly chart. 
Let's take a few polls for entertainment. 

[Did BTC bottom out?](https://www.strawpoll.me/16079851) 

[Where is the bottom at?](https://www.strawpoll.me/16079860)

[Do you think the ETF will go through?](https://www.strawpoll.me/16079871)

[Are you bullish or bearish right now?](https://www.strawpoll.me/16079897)
Was there a free booze rally I missed out on? Why is errbody tipsy trading?
Stop sell triggered at 6249: oh yes yes yes yes yes


second later oh non nonononono
At some point, you have to consider that given the number of users and capabilities of the platform, a price in the $4000-7000 range is accurate and suitable.   I'm not surprised that we have such low volatility here.    I feel that this is a fairly accurate valuation for what Bitcoin can do in mid-2018.
Added a few extra short term bullish patterns, to the long term wyckoff

https://uk.tradingview.com/chart/BTCUSD/YaVfJpg0-wyckoff-IH-S-round-bott-accending-channel/
The vast majority of all the top "ideas" on tradingview are heavily bearish, yet the shorts aren't reflecting this. Seems all they're trying to paint is that "it was lower last year, so it'll go back to near that price". Wtf?
I drew some lines. 

I want to direct your attention to the yellow and orange lines. They are nearly parallel. 

*If* history repeats itself, we can expect a huge panic drop soon, below the current orange trend. Followed by a sharp rebound. Just shortly before we get back to that old uptrend/resistance (green/purple).

https://i.imgur.com/dVRy35W.png

That will be the "reset" of the market we've all been waiting for.
Guys, it's *ok* for the price to be above $6,280 for a little while. Really, it's fine. You won't break out in hives, it's not radioactive...it's ok. No need to fire-sale your BTC every time it possibly, potentially considers approaching that level. It's not a big deal. It can just...range in the $6,280 - $6,320 area for a while, instead.

(Same applies for $6,210 in terms of buying.)
Guys, stop this discussion thread. Market has decided that the fair value of BTC is $ 6,200. This is where it will stay ad infinitum.
As I’m out of position i must say that the action today is just retarded. Dump rejected, pump rejected, rinse and repeat. Fucking decide already
What are the price implications for an approval for bitcoin etf? I hear that there will be no impact on price and I also hear a new bull market if it gets approved. Thanks.

Edit: or rather, what do you guys think will happen?
Ethbtc looking very bearish, bear flag/rising wedge with constant rejection of 0.07 which was support for weeks. Short ethbtc is the best swing trade I see right now
This area is so uncomfortable because you don’t know what’ll it’ll do.
From a trading perspective, this is an area where you should be a buyer. Doesn't matter if you 'think' it's going lower. I won't close my shorts yet just in case (will let the market take them out in profit) and to mitigate my losses if it would dump hard, but I'm also buying heavily into these lows and small dips. The chance for a final flush towards the low 6000's or right below is high but this lacks the momentum to break the absolute lows. 
Failed attempt at 6.3k again prepare for another dump. Disclaimer: I'm not short
[deleted]
Pump it and paint many dojis.
[deleted]
6300 rejected hard again, sooner or later this is going to crash to low 5000s.
Maybe whales are keeping BTC range bound until G20 FUD in late July when they will fuck us over below 5.7k
Something is going to happen today or tomorrow ONCE VOLUME PICKS UP. As I have been saying since last dump we most likely are going back to 6800. We are bouncing between resistance levels. Once we pass 6300 its a clear shot to 6800. Only worried if we dropped below 6135 which did not happen yet.

Edit: Low volume day most likely not going to hold over 6300 right now but if we do and volume picks up its going to 6800. Most likely going to continue to bounce between 6300 and 6100. Good day to scalp if volume stays low.
Why is ADA still 70 sats higher on Mex than other exchanges?
This didn't age well :D https://www.reddit.com/r/CryptoCurrency/comments/86rgj9/2018s_bull_run_on_the_way_a_must_read_analysis/


I&HS-ception
All this delicious hopium only proves we still have a long way to go before we get a real trend reversal. Probabely another 12-24 months of sideways bear action to go
Trollbox is so cancerous 
So this is what I think the current outlook looks like. https://i.imgur.com/HGOG5nR.png

If you're holding and longing and think making a new 9 month low is bullish then you must be new. 

Buying BTC is risky. Buying and holding is believing it will be around basically forever. It'll be around forever as long as there are miners but what will the price be if everyone moves on.

Coinbase is looking into new coins. Soon every exchange will offer numerous coins with decent liquidity as time goes on.

For now BTC has the dominance in the altcoin market and being #1 in market cap. I almost think you gotta have an exit plan in BTC. In 10 years almost all BTC will be mined. Right now numerous alts are almost 100% out there. Some the creators hold some coins to help fund them in the future. 

Just find it hard to be a new whale buying tens of millions of dollars worth of BTC when something else might turn out to be the better buy. That's why it almost pays to wait. Wait and see what comes out on top. This isn't a short term race. Some coin will be used for the rest of our lifetime and our kids. Hold a ton of BTC and dump them into numerous alts. Hold dozens of coins. Wait to see what one gets adopted by the world long term.
[deleted]
this looks like yet another failing attempt to break 6300$, resistance doesn't look that strong but there is just not enough buying power.
Waiting for second rejection off $6400 to short ... long if we manage to move above 

Sort of in purgatory right now :/
Hah :) I just went through those two last statements in the past days. Feels like we should have gone up already if this should turn to some sort of relief rally...
meh, i'm just waiting for another reluctant BGD. Volume isnt low enough and order books not thin enough for a cheap pump yet. We'll be held in this range till volume evaporates.
Lmao. Couldn’t have said it better myself. 
Lmaooo there it is another reluctant bgd that nobody wants/falling for 
Whichever direction it decides will be a great place for a margin long or short because I assume it will go up/down with great force.
Well, we are *always* as far a away from the support line as *some* point of the 2014 market...

What makes "now" different from a week ago, in your opinion?
“We should hang out by the quarry and throw *things* down there.”
Confusion is a common sentiment when at/near a local bottom.
That's a couple of tuna subs.
 Yup. last 3 days in hindsight easy money scalping 6300-6100. The volume this dangerously low means a whale could come ruin the party at any time though.
Anyone wanna walk 30 miles to collect water in a bucket from a remote location to bring back to my village in Nigeria and talk crypto, hmu 
Where?
What happened to the good old days of Netflix and chill? 
Ye
Are we? 
I can't imagine breaching 5k will stop at 4k. Either wick through 5k and bounce or 5k will become resistance and we'll revisit 3k.
This makes it look like we are so close to 100k. Nice work!
Pretty cool log chart. Thanks man
What does that grey line around the summer of 2016 represent?
Bad data point from bitstamp st $1.50 from cryptowatch there.
Could you provide a higher res version?
Hodling is great during bull markets, but bad during bear markets. Imagine hodling from 12k. At this point though, its probably better for many to hodl given how late it is in the bear market.
it's a lot more fun this way...everyone gets a chance to close at a good spot ;)
Upvoted because roasted halloumi cheese is vallhalla 
Boo no pics. Glad you had a nice day!
Haha love this community 
Haha glad you had a good time, mate! 
I hope you're implying we're due for some yuge moves up in the future.
I’m looking at the same thing. I’m considering to close my long from 6130.

The OBV indicator showed some hidden _bull_ divs earlier, that was on the shorter 1H. Not a strong indication at all.

Looking at 2-4H RSI the buying power is simply not there at the moment.
I'm not an expert in div but you've cut wicks and 6.4 isn't exactly the top. Didn't look like it's valid.
more like in July, Bitcoin die? /s
Near previous all time high, buy.
Anyone from Chicago, especially hodlers?  I’m here for the week and would love to meet other hodlers to get plastered with and maybe get my hands into your bag...

Be careful who you meet online, kids. Especially in the crypto space and if you’ve hinted at your crypto assets. 

Sorry to be a downer but just want everyone to be safe!  
To be fair, sellers have been impotent as well. We're right in the middle of the range we've been stuck in (6150-6320), so no position for me at the moment.

I'll try to grab a short at the top of the range, or a long at the bottom, and then trade a breakout in either direction.
Lol, you sound harsh on the buyers, Chew :-p We are just out enjoying the summer and getting drunky.
I wouldn't call it huge at all, there was barely any volume in both the pump and dump
Consolidation before a move up or a move down 

Basically a matter of waiting out to see if we run out of sellers or buyers first at this level 
>this
>[th is]  
>1.  
>*(used to indicate a person, thing, idea, state, event, time, remark, etc., as present, near, just mentioned or pointed out, supposed to be understood, or by way of emphasis):*    e.g **This is my coat.**
This is good for bitcoin dude
They've been here for 7 months shorting, and laughing ;)
😂😂😂
If you got the money honey, I got the time!
#MeToo
United we stand 
Don't worry bro this is just an accumulation phase

EDIT: /s
darn that volume is crazy low. If BTC is so cheap, then why are people hesitating to buy it? I think we will have one more huge leg down. Too many bagholders are waiting for the bull run and dump their bag on it. I refuse to believe we will have a reversal here without capitulation. Most of the Alts holder will capitulate first, which will then drag BTC down with it.
What are you guys grilling? 
> https://twitter.com/altcoin_io/status/1017904432439128064

Yea, they sure got Coinbase good. I'm sure Coinbase, probably the most popular crypto exchange in the U.S. and one of the most well known exchanges globally, won't ever recover from that tweet from 'altcoin.io'.
And when does the current 5D candle close?
What does this mean? Im new to markets 
I've calculated mining cost without equipment price included couple days ago and it was above 6k with electricity price over $0.1 so there is no surprise. Usually bitcoin trades 2.5 times mining cost.
Something tells me the exchanges do not want this puppy below $6k
Tradingview will let you take snapshots and post direct links to them on here. 
"Some hopium for the bulls...

Ive drawn two lines here"

Sums up TA in a nutshell 
I believe that it will happen eventually. But maybe not now, not this year, not next year, maybe not the year after... But someday. 


The Winklevoss 2017 ETF proposal was rejected because the SEC found that the significant markets for Bitcoin tend to be unregulated overseas markets that are potentially subject to price manipulation. But this creates a chicken and egg problem. How do we develop well-capitalized and regulated markets in the U.S. and Europe if financial innovators aren’t allowed to bring products to market that grow domestic demand for digital currencies like Bitcoin?
CBOE always gets what it wants
“Protecting investors” 


I always get a laugh out of this. Who are they trying to fool? Protect them from insane profits while robbing them dry though healthcare? 
Absolutely. Under 6135 we are going down to next support at 5700. If we go above 6300 we are going up to around 6800. I think we are going back up. Last dump was weak and didn't drop fast or low enough. Price has held above 6200. Once volume picks up that is.
yes
sure
I commented earlier about this. The IH&S gets invalidated if BTC cannot close above $6800 sometime next week. If it does, then I'm going all in.
Yes, still a chance. 
This might be a stupid question. Are there rules in regards to volume while forming an iH&S? Should we be seeing low, high, a gradual increase... Or does volume not matter? 
[deleted]
What still concerns me, is the Gox coins that are due to be released in September. Even if the holders are credited fiat and not given the actual coins, those coins will then be released for Kobayashi to do with what they wish. If I had to speculate on what happens next, I would speculate that this is the start of a mini run up into September to push the price up, prior to a big sell off in September when the Gox coins are released. Then we find the final low, and drift within a small price range until the next bull market is triggered.

http://www.businessinsider.com/bitcoin-price-speculation-mt-gox-bitcoin-wont-be-sold-until-september-2018-3
Indeed, just one of the top 10 ALTs doing a 25% move changes the game. I have seen it, with my own eyes man!

Edit: lol, you guys think I'm bullshitting? Okay...
You dont think 20k to 5.8k is capitulation?
More likely to go up via a dripping tap than ‘floodgates’
Wait. We're just testing the upper resistance...
Sorry, I'm not sure I understand what they mean. Are they implying that government regulation is going to kill crypto?
> seems quite stable for now

 #Accumulation^tm

My favorite meme.
>I like that again the 6250 range seems quite stable for now

Dammit!
Alts havent been bleeding the last few days
On one question the majority do not think we have bottomed out. But on the other question the majority thinks 5700-6000 is the bottom. LOL.

Summarises this sub perfectly.
The three options for the bottom are basically that we already hit it, that it’s $4.7k-4.9k, or that it’s much lower. I selected “much lower” even though my target is $3.8k-$4.2k. Shouldn’t we have more options than these?
Is there any way of stopping that captcha shit?
Shitfaced trading is the best. You go 10x long or short then pass out. Wake up in 10 hours to see how you did. 
why 4000-7000 and not 5800-7000 for your kinda bizarre observation?

Edit: I know why
>  to the long term wyckoff

Not this word again............
I wouldn't think the ideas on trading view are indicative of the overall market sentiment.
High timeframe momentum indicators are bearish. Look at the weekly/ monthly rsi and macd. This should tell you the trend might be down. If you believe the trend is down you can look at past price history to find support levels.
Yeah but the 2014 bear market was fueled by the mtgox hack in February. if you dont remember.... 850k btc was stolen, which at the time was approx 500mill. a rather large chunk of the trading supply/ market cap

Have we had anything close? No.

Don't care about silly lines, without catalysts for ambitious predictions

A panic drop? Panic about what? It's only been positive news, y'all are delusional. ETF soon, regulatory clarity, huge infrastructure investment and development, new fiat gateways, steps forward in the technology. Segwit, lighting network, schoor sigs. 

List goes on, it's crazy to just compare 2014 to now without looking at history, TA on its own is stupid

Accumulation baby
I can totally see this happening, 6k being defended and we are hanging around, bounces becoming smaller. Usually when we spent too long around a price level we just dropped hard and fast, 1k in 24h 
[deleted]
ok adjusted sell orders to $6320.01.
feel free to do your part in pushing the price upwards if that's waht you want.
Whenever I heard something like that, the price dumped hard shortly after...
I learned to never trust Sat/Sun movements. Too many bots. Wait till Monday
Volume is super low. Don't expect any real movement with the volume this low.
I know that people will say that this time is different yada yada yada.

All I know is that the second most profitabe btc trading day I ever had was going 10x short before the last ETF decision (2017) when everyone thought it would go through and ran the price up...it was denied

edit : I guess I should add that my guess is that before the decision the price will rise and then you place your bet as to whether it will go higher or be a "sell the news" event
The approval will be postponed. Then it'll be rejected. I wouldn't bother speculating any further than that. 
Maybe , my only problem with it , is that when the reversa comes , that short is going to really hurt 
I had a look at the ETHBTC Chart. I agree that that is a bear flag, however I also spotted a much larger falling wedge. I think if BTC & ETH break up from here, that wedge is going to break up too. But if they break down, the bearflag is going to break down. 
And with a possible BTC ETF coming that will also drive it lower. You have a target bottom?
>From a trading perspective, this is an area where you should be a buyer. Doesn't matter if you 'think' it's going lower. I won't close my shorts yet 
.. The chance for a final flush towards the low 6000's or right below is high

LOL. I assume this is a joke. 
> this lacks the momentum to break the absolute lows.

It doesn't need momentum.  It will likely test 5800 again or multiple times and then break through.  The price is 6200.  The 2018 trend is down until otherwise and no indication of that yet.
We’re having failed attempts at 6100-6300 down and up for 2 days now. I don’t see why this one specifically gonna change anything
Nah, that wasn't an attempt. Look at the volume, just a typical slowly creep up and elevator down. Shet scalping this is actually really profitable.
Ever seen the Grand Canyon?
I'm a bear and I downvote you, because you don't add anything constructive to the discussion.
doubted that dump got absorbed by buyers nicely.
based on the volume, I'm not sure if anyone cares enough to try and push it that low.
maybe trade more than 1m chart
Not unless it goes under 6135. It keeps bouncing and rejecting hard off of that too.
Or until ETF when we moon. I love meaningless speculations on Saturdays
Down it is. Look at the upvote/downvote differential
Pass 6300, don’t see any BGD.
Because it's a futures contract not real coins 
>Why is ADA still 70 sats higher on Mex than other exchanges?

Bitmex is not an exchange, its a futures  trading platform. You are trading derivatives, not buying/selling coins. You cannot buy or sell ADA or any other crypto on Bitmex. 
> Must read

He lost me there
This didn’t age well*

*99% of all comments on this sub 
Another? You call 20,000-5700 sideways and i call you full of shit
You took a short position didnt you? Spamming this post is not going to influence the market by even 0.00001$, you know that right?
You are delusional 
I agree, I'm personally looking into Dentacoin. The real world applications are infinite- it has a great team of dentists behind it and a great slogan: "The digital gold for your next filling.™️"
You really don't know what differentiates Bitcoin from the rest? You waste time writing all of this when you are a novice in your understanding of the tech. You are obviously new here if you think Bitcoins early market dominance is the only thing it has over all these alts and icos and shitcoins.   Why is it whenever someone posts that others are new its from an account less than a year old? Maybe spend less time chasing shitcoins and learn about why Bitcoin even works in the first place.

Altcoins cannot be decentralized. Dilemma: the more marketing efforts put into them, the more centralized they are. Only BTC is decentralized and secure by design.
lol. If you think CB is about to save your shitcoin from being useless garbage that nobody care about, you’re gonna be surprised. Also CB has become a useless garbage just like your shitcoin so i guess they fit together 
Is that you, Ran?
Can say the same about 6200 selling power. Just putting things in perspective here.
Not really. Volume is extremely low. Expect the price to bounce between 6300 and 6100 until volume picks up and it breaks out either way. Last 2 days has been extremely good days to scalp.
Pretty much same here. 

The one thing I will note is that in 2014-2015 the only time we ever went sideways for this long (a month) was at the bottom. Although there was a few dumps/wicks down still. 

It's the main thing giving me pause now

if we hadn't recently made a new low I'd probably be bullish at this point but...we did, so things are very confusing.
Yea i was thinking that if we were at $10k just going sideways at $9.3-9.6k things would look pretty damn good actually. 
It will go up when those who control the market find it in their best interest to spike it up.   And same for the next plunge lower.
lol 😰
It can sit still for quite a while. In fact, that's what I've been waiting for to call a bottom
Not really sure what you're trying to say here... care to clarify?
The genuis of The Office:

1 Create a bit character who speaks 0.7 lines per episode.

2 Make his quotes so legendary that you could post his lines in near any situation and reap top karma.

(Darnell's a chump, I woulda done it for free)
YES 
Not in Argentina where I live my friend. We just devalued our national currency by 50% against USD this past 20 days, so it is indeed enough money for the bi-weekly groceries.
Yes indeed. But with SL's in place I've been winning way more than what I've been losing.

It's almost too predictable.
Anyone wanna help my family move to a new house, fix appliances, and talk crypto, hmu 
Anybody wanna  meet up somewhere and make up different scenarios about meeting up in sketchy places to talk about crypto and talk about crypto?
Two weeks finally came gentlemen, bitcoin usage for unbanked Africans confirmed.
I would but I can't cuz Bitcoin ded.
I'll just meet you where you live and take you there
Yes
It really all depends on price/time... if we continue to slowly bleed down the $20k log line we'll breach $5k, $4k and then $3k before visiting the long term support line. This would be the most expedient way to reach $3k without violating either the $20k log resistance (log resistance has never once been violated in bubble history) nor violating the long term support - These are both assumptions I hold when forecasting.  

If instead we linger at $6k and then capitulate, it's more likely we get a bounce off mid $4's with the potential to push subsequent dips enough far into into the future that the support line moves above the $3k range. 

If you believe the long term support line will hold, then it's important to the reference percentage price would have to change in order to find support.  

Currently if price dropped by about 53% we'd intersect with the support line at about $2850.

If we reference this same distance in 2014, it would be when price was just a bit over $300 and just prior to the final capitulation drop that ended the bear market.

[Check it out](https://www.tradingview.com/x/9wfY6QaO/)


Flash crash I reckon 
Bad data point.
I'll leave it'll like this though
The bull markets are much more impactful than the bear markets (as in, over years price constantly rises), so hodling is actually objectively a safer idea, unless you can guarantee gains during the bear markets (which no one can with 100% confidence).
I've been hodling since 2014 man, that's what really hurts. I've accumulated btc, then just lost half of it, then made it back, then lost again. That's fucked up. I really think I need help, this is destroying my life.
> everyone gets a chance to ~~close at a good spot~~ get rekt, shaken out, and/or whipsawed

FTFY....
Hard to say, but I think bears are running out of time. The longer we stay here, the harder its going to be to push the price down. Look at this [chart](https://prnt.sc/k6covr) with the stupid arbitrary fucking line I drew.  Its acted as a major point of resistance and support for bitcoin in the past, and Bitcoin has rarely strayed too far below this line. Meaning if we dump NOW, the lowest it can go is around 4600 at the [green line](https://prnt.sc/k6cgkn) but as time goes on, this low will become higher and higher. It would take a significant selloff/momentum to breach that green line. Its possible but I Just don't think its very likely. 

To me, anything below the purple line is "Despair" and the purple line is breached at 5.7k at this point. 

Imo we're not going to be seeing 2.5 or 3k in this bear market. 
My understanding is that RSI is calculated on closing price, so cutting wicks is typical when looking for RSI divergence.

The first price point I used is certainly lower than the recent 6800 top, but it does represent a small local top. I don’t think it’s completely invalid, but I’d agree that it isn’t a very strong divergence. That’s mainly why I framed it as ‘something to keep an eye on’ rather than something to open a position over.
I usually have my rock hammer with me and don't even get winded running up hills 

So I mean... it's their funeral 
Is this a thing? Meeting dudes online from crypto subs? 
Every push down is weaker and weaker. No man's land right here imo.
Well sellers have kept us no more than 8% above the YTD low and 8 month low, so not exactly impotent. 

Inb4 someone zooms out to an even longer time frame and says it's kept us at 600% of what it was in 2017 lol
The fight is on, who will win?
Yeah, this is also the lowest volume in 6 months+.
Boom roasted 

There was no capitulation volume stick on the end of the last reversal. It was just a slow bottoming out process. I think small groups are trying to push it up but bots and scalpers are preventing that.
They day is about to close on GDAX and today's total volume was **235** for crying out loud.
> If BTC is so cheap, then why are people hesitating to buy it? 

It's not cheap, it is very expensive.

> I think we will have one more huge leg down. 

Many more legs down are likely...$3500 or so is probably in the cards, but will take several months to work its way down there.
I'm a vegetarian, so there'll be no bears or bulls on the menu ;)

Seriously though, we usually do some middle-eastern style with stuffed sweet peppers, hummus and some veggie shish kabobs. Maybe throw on some portobello mushrooms on there as well ;)
Bears
The Kraken tweet is better *and* it doesn't matter who tweeted either of these. The point is valid and the joke is funny. Coinbase is a complete failure under the leadership of Brian Armstrong. They just happened to be in the position to establish a monopoly, but don't expect that to last as the industry grows. Coinbase has fucked up and done stupid things far too many times. They are a joke.
When the Tenkan-Sen line (blue) crosses below the Kijun-Sen line (yellow), it is considered a bearish signal.

The Tenkan-Sen and Kijun-Sen lines are basically moving averages with the Tenkan representing a shorter time frame and the Kijun-Sen representing a longer one

Edit: mixed up the colors for a sec, fixed now 
> Usually bitcoin trades 2.5 times mining cost.

What makes you think that it will stay the same? Why is 2.5x more significant than 2.3x or 2.1x?
It just requires too much momentum which you can't get with the indicators already low. It would require a catalyst. 
I mean...the whole point of this sub is to share ideas for trading and most ideas are TA.
by first regulating all crypto exchanges and make sure that there is a process to prevent fraud and manipulation.
Protecting them from a market which is built on a foundation of fraud and promoted by dubious characters.  Willy bot and Mt Gox fraud caused the 2013 bubble, that's proven.  How long till we find out Tether caused this one?  How long before these bucket shop exchanges get raided and we find out the extent of their criminal behavior?  No chance this ETF goes through with how shady bitcoin is.
Its not a stupid question at all. As far as I can remember, volume should be lower in the right shoulder and then it should breakout on high volume upon completion. I might have it mixed up but I’m fairly sure I’m correct.
NO MORE GOX COINS!
IT IS ALREADY OVER!!!!!!
4 weeks ago they are starting to send people BTC! They are allowed!

They won't sell anymore BTC. You have 6 months to write them, they start sending BTC around EOY
https://bitcoinist.com/mt-gox-bitcoin-whale-trustee-wont-sell-btc/
Not even close, the attitude in here is wayyy to bullish still.  There's been pain, but not all out desperation.
Dripping tap turns into floodgates.

Now it probably won’t be a BGD but in this market you never know. This is crypto. This could very well go up 100% in one day. Imagine a bloodbath for bears if that happens, everyone on margin gets wiped out, everyone who sold will need to start buying back in above $10K. The order books are fairly thin, a whale could set a 5000 btc sell Wall  at 10,501 then market buy everything up to 10,500 and then force liquidation’s and stop losses(which all shorts have below 10K) would buy back all the coins he bought and give them a very nice profit 

Now yes a scenario like that is mostly a bull fantasy, the chances of that happening in one day are slim. But in crypto it’s not impossible

That’s why I never short on margin. The only shorting I do is sell high with the hopes of buying low. Because crypto is inherently bullish and shorting on margin just leads to getting wiped out in the long run by some surpise news release that no TA can help you plan for, and a growing industry like crypto always have some surprising announcement around the corner 
failed quite hard
I assume they mean that Cryptocurrency is a measure/leading indicator of excess liquidity and speculation at this point in the business cycle. That being known they think that interest rate hikes by the fed and worldwide Quantitative Tightening will place a firm restriction on that excess liquidity which they believe will negatively effect the prices of Cryptocurrencies.

I'm curious to hear what people here think about that view,
Almost as dumb as thinking the US is what drives the crypto market 
muh wyckoff 
I only have dust left on binance, spread out over a few dozen of the top alts. Both the BTC value and dollar value of my wallet have consistently declined for days now. I understand certain alts are up today (ADA, XLM, ZRX), but overall the trend has been down.
$2800 ... 2019's equivalent to 2015's $160 
I don't think so :( 
I won't admit that I've done this... But... 
never bought crypto while drunk, but I recall buying $TSLA on St. Patrick's Day last year.
Ok, then why not share your insight? I don't see why 5800-7000 is clearly more plausible than 4000-7000, nor that there's even a significant difference between the two. 
bogdanov, wyckoff it
wyckoff
I've never heard anyone say this but I feel a self induced crash in December is more bearish than a news/event crash from Mt gox
Which line are you referring to?
Thank you for your service! If the sell order doesn't hit, please proceed to panic sell the bottom instead, at $6,210.01. We will then resume our regularly-scheduled price of $6,250.
Can confirm.  I once said something like that, it forced the continuation of the bear market.
I assume some move will trigger more volume like it always do..
This is the part where a whale steps in and decides where we go.
There is no possible way for you to know this.
Been trading altcoins with margin for quite some time now, I dont have feelings anymore
Did i miss something about “possible ETF coming”? I keep reading info about ETFs but none of those posts having positivity about an approval. The first ETFs was denied for the reason that Bitcoin cannot be regulated. I don’t see how SEC will change their thinking anytime soon? 
Why would it be a joke?
They built that attempt up the last 5 hours and lost the final push.
Friended you. Been scalping this low volume bounce between  6100 and 6300 as well. This is what Bitcoin does regardless of fancy tech analysis. It bounces between resistances until it breaks through either way with volume. During low volume times like this is perfect time to scalp.
[deleted]
Yeah, another double-sided dildo on the 30m timeframe. We are ranging hard here.
Lol he fell for ETF meme
Right? So much better than the Wednesday variety. 
Read my edit. Low volume day today. Im scalping making money off the low volume today. Once volume picks up 6135 and 6300 are the points to watch. We are bouncing off resistance levels until we break through either way. 


I know that, but the difference is huge. 
Im actually a hodler. Market is bearish sideways hard to counteract that. Hopefully next year things will turn around
What a convincing counterargument you've made. 
90% of dentists recommend dentacoin.    
/s
Britons premium is 50%+
I heard that Coinbase is looking for an option that they might look into adding Dentacoin, they don’t have eta for that but they search a possibility that in unknown future they will look for an option that they might check if  it’s possible for the technology to be on it. Dentacoin is the real Bitcoin
Soon all dentists are going to go anonymous as a true test to Dentacoins decentralization. Make sure to get all your crowns and filings done before that happens and stock up on mouthwash and floss. Then it just needs to tackle Bitcoins market dominance and head start and world adoption here we come!
Why is bitcoin better than the rest? I was thinking about this today. 
I think it has a poor use as a currency, which only leaves the digital gold argument. 

From there the only use I see would be to hedge against excessive inflation of the local currency, but any crypto could fill that role.

I'll add I think (if it sticks around) the inflation of the PRICE of btc would be lower than the inflation rate. So it wouldn't be a store of value as people suggest, just a better store of value than fiat.

My major interest is trading, so my knowledge of crypto is basic relative to the majority here. So what is it about BTC that makes it better?
He didn't mention decentralization at all in his nonsensical rant. Clearly dude is missing the big picture here while chasing centralized shitcoins in his attempt to get rich quick. Utterly clueless about the basics of what he is ranting about.
yeah looks like bulls didn't give up yet with this resistance.
Yeah... I still remain bearish but I’m watching everything and ready to update my assumptions..

Could see this uptick to $6.6k and head back down. 

All that being said ..  attempts at lower lows keep being bought up 

Sidelines for now
Why new low is bearish? We bounced off 5.7 twice, been bleeding from 10k for 2 months now. If this is rounded bottom it can take another 2 months to go up.
Back in 2015, I think the sideways range was between 180 and 300. Something like that. Today that’s the equivalent of a range between 6,000 and 10,000. I’m with you though, we recently made a new low so idk what’s happening, probably going down eventually, but this is well within the same scale as the 2015 sideways.
It's only confusing if you actually believe TA is anything more than pseudoscience. There is very little scientific evidence to support it, and this evidence is flimsy at best.
I don't know how I could be any clearer.
You were in the parking lot earlier, that’s how I know you!
lambo time
Sorry, didn't mean to sound derogatory. Measuring relatively small profits/losses in "tuna subs" is a meme in this sub.
Only if there's a dead hooker involved.
I mean 5k was horizontal either way and last ATH before sick bull run. If it won't hold i don't see it stopping before 3k which held through China ban.
To under $10? Wow, I missed that one...


You dont need any gains in a bear market to outperform holding, you just need to lose less than 70%.
> I really think I need help, this is destroying my life.

If this is how you really feel, you need to step back from the markets for a while. Maybe for a week, or a year, it depends on your priorities, mental state, etc. Find a mix of BTC/fiat that you're most comfortable with (balancing the pain of potentially seeing BTC below $5k/3k/etc. vs. the FOMO of potentially seeing it at $10k+) and just...walk away. Close the charts and the trading platforms, turn off the alarms...spend a good while focusing on yourself, your work, your family, sports, hobbies, fitness, etc.

Part of being a great trader (or even hodler) is having a balanced mental state, and what goes hand in hand with that is the self-awareness to know when you're too out of balance. It seems you're acknowledging the problem, which is good...now you just need to address it. Take the time off (as much as you feel you need), and if/when you want to go back, start by just watching the markets again for a while before you actively trade (to get a feel for them again). Definitely don't chase losses (now, or if/when you get back) as that's the surest way to double them.

But, maybe, you don't need/want to go back. Trading isn't for everyone (to say the least) and there's no shame in recognizing it's not for you. It's risky, stressful, annoying, exasperating, and exceedingly difficult most of the time. In a lot of ways it's like entrepreneurship...there's a lot of pressure to be an entrepreneur these days (like there is a trader, around these parts) but the cold truth is most people are not cut out for it and would be better off doing something else, and maybe just hodling a little BTC long-term as part of a balanced portfolio. Don't let the rah-rah-rah and confirmation bias of this sub convince you otherwise.

I wish you luck, man. I've been there, and a lot of other people have as well. Take the break, take care of yourself. I think people will agree it tends to be the best way forward in this sort of situation.
Dude btc was at 20k tf didn’t you sell like greed shouldn’t be that bad for you honestly people who wanted to make more deserved to not take profits
"Hard to say, but I think bears are running out of time. The longer we stay here, the harder its going to be to push the price down"

Except the exact same argument can be used in reverse...the bulls could basically be classed as having no pulse at this point...the longer we keep dropping (almost consistently for 6 months) the harder its going go be to push the price up
I am banking on this as well, the only reason I see for us to breach the trendline is if this ETF get rejected, but barring that, I don't see any real bad news in the near future...unless there's something I don't know about.
Do you have versions of your charts with prices visible (axis labels)?
Definitely right on RSI calculated on closing price, so you do cut wicks. But the way to do it is peak to peak, trough to trough. That is barely a peak, so not putting a lot of stock in tha one.

This one though I'm watching 12H https://www.tradingview.com/x/jORlIqs9/

And

https://www.tradingview.com/x/vgCi5KpU/

I meant that you count as a top price when we dropped and went sideways, don't like it this way, but like I said, not so familiar with div.
*GeoDudeBroMan uses rock hammer. Oh, it’s effective*
No and it shouldn't become one.
As is every push up... 
Exactly.  The end of a bear market will usually be at or near the YTD low, right?

Sellers DID do a good job to get us here, but now we've reached a point of....I want to say indecision, but it feels more like indifference.  Nobody cares about the market anymore, there's no panic or fomo left.
We will find out after the world cup match tomorrow. Just so you know, crypto betting is quite big. I wonder what the winners will do with these extra coins ;)), look at Monday and Tuesday for reference.
man that sounds delicious. although I'm literally sitting in bed eating some grilled chicken so I might sneak some meat in to eat with it 😅
Throw some halloumi cheese on the grill too my man - doesn’t melt and grills up extremely well. 
lol
I say bull to that

Edit: actually he can't since he's vegetarian lol
Lol what?

Coinbase is one of the main reasons crypto is as popular today as it is. 

It’s possibly the most user friendly crypto exchange in existence and one where many people (myself included) bought their first bit of crypto.

It’s never been hacked making it one of the most secure cryptocurrency exchanges thus far.

They’ve done a ton of work in terms of bringing big money into this space with their entire suite of institutional products.

In fact, you’d be hard pressed to find a single exchange that’s done more good for cryptocurrencies, especially in the past year.

So to call it a “complete failure” and a “joke” is honestly laughable.
I generally love Kraken’s attitude to many things. Just too bad the liquidity sucks on their exchange. I just use it as my fiat on-ramp and spot exchange.
Genuinely curious, who do you see replacing Coinbase in the future? I know Reddit hates them, but in terms of their target demographic, they seem to (as you implied) have a virtual monopoly. 

So, it's hard for me to see how they're a complete failure (except in terms of earning Reddit's approval). Open to new information though. 
Wait ichimoku is just MAs closing? lmao -_- here i was dismissing it as astrology 
Thank you, and what does hedging mean?
Just some CNN bullshit numbers.
Which is what they have been doing. I believe that it will get approved and regulations will get hashed out before it begins. 

The developments over the last year, imo, point to it happening. Futures was just a test to see how it goes. One of the guys who runs a crypto workspace here in Cali showed myself and a friend (we help organize our local group), an email that was an invoice of an OTC transaction earlier in April for $250 million. Not going to name the company but it's one of the larger well known financial firms. 

The big guys are getting in that is certain. It may not happen but I honestly think it will. If it doesn't then THAT might trigger a capitulation but that would also cause these institutional companies that are involved to lose money and they don't want that. I'm sure the SEC has met with them over the last year to discuss this in private or else they wouldn't be getting involved. 


Man, I sure wish I was as smart as you. You've really got it all figured out, don't you? 
Thanks! That makes sense for the breakout to be high volume, but I wasn't sure if there was a pattern to watch for while it plays out. 
Thanks for the update.

It doesn’t mean people won’t sell once they receive the coins. It just means it’s not Kobayashi selling them. You’re assuming that all recipients are hodlers and not sellers. There will be people wanting to take profits considering the increase in price since the hack. The article also states that there won’t be any selling “for the foreseeable future”. So your assertion of “it’s over” is not correct.
I hear you... Expecting capitulation/desperation before a reversal is likely what most people who think they are "smart" are doing.

As a result it may not play out that way. I think the confluence of uncertainty is really just creating a large sideways channel that has so far left us between 5.8k and 11.7k.

I guess my point is that you could be right but it is TRULY anyone's best guess. Hence you shouldn't be too biased to thinking that you or anyone here is going to be right. Also sentiment is a good way to trade when there is no meaningful news (now...) but the moment something that fundamentally matters is announced or made public then the price movement will reflect that most likely.

In short this is no mans land truthfully.
I don't think btc is going to have some massive capitulation wick, people capitulated out of alts back into BTC already (eth went from 1420 to 360) which stopped it from going to some deep wick
That would be awesome, id love to see that happen
Well, the final decision is still out. But I expect a drop soon.
Thank you for your explanation. I think I agree with SloppySynapses. Since crypto is mostly speculation, people will probably pull out of it as a result. Although, as Sloppy pointed out, crypto has never been around when we've had world wide economic downturn, which is a real possibility soon. 

However, I think a downturn in traditional markets will only hurt a BTC bullrun. I don't think it will affect it much if we continue this bear market, as I don't think large firms have a huge stake in BTC. They've probably sold everything off last bubble. But if BTC starts another bull run and they all buy in to ride the ride, but if we then have an economic collapse, they'll probably liquidate their BTC first before anything else. 
This makes the most sense to me- great way to explain it. I still think it's absolutely no coincidence that bitcoin began its hugest bull run yet almost exactly the same time a republican president was elected in the midst of a recovering economy. 

Excess speculation and greed abound: traditional markets have performed exceedingly well since he was elected and cryptocurrencies represent that overflow of capital stemming from economic confidence.

This is another large reason why I'm very hesitant to expect another crypto bull run. As much as we all like to assume this market runs on lines and TA, the faith in the market is arguably fundamentally tied to faith in conventional markets. Any economic uncertainty and crypto stagnates at best or goes bye bye at worst...in my opinion. 

Some people think people will pour money into crypto in an economic downturn but not only has it never been tested during a period like that (it's only ever existed in a recovering + booming economic state) it also has to somehow seem more stable and appealing in times of uncertainty. I'm personally very skeptical of that

We'll see what happens though, idk what conventional markets are about to do 
Shame. One second of voting followed by 30-90 seconds of clicking fucking freeways. 
Seriously? Not a significant difference? Just ignoring the fact that 4000 didn’t happened and our current local bottom is 5800? If 4000 is gonna happen than what in the world gonna hold it from dropping more? It’s gonna create a huge a panic. Also i was just commenting on your ridiculous assumption which I don’t think is even right so how can i share insight on something i think is retard?
>hidden bull divs 
Good comment.  And I agree, this has scared off all the normies BIGLY.
Not sure I agree, but I think there's some logic there.

Mt Gox was a failure of one specific exchange with obvious problems - rational people understood that it didn't say anything fundamental about Bitcoin, and thus could expect the market to recover once FUD faded. Since this latest downturn can't be attributed to any external event, it would seem to indicate *something* fundamental about Bitcoin (not the technology of course, but the markets) that can't be explained by pointing a finger at a single comically amateur massive point of failure. 

Again, not sure how much importance to give this perspective, but it's worth a thought. Maybe. 
> Yeah but the 2014 bear market was fueled by the mtgox hack in February. if you dont remember....

You don't remember. 2014 bear market was started when China started to regulate/ban Bitcoin.

> Have we had anything close?

Yes, we have.   Gov't regulation and bans from Google, FB, and Twitter.

>  It's only been positive news, y'all are delusional.

You are delusional. News has mostly been very negative this year.







[deleted]
Actually you are right. Volume can spike very quickly so I shouldn't say don't expect anything. Anything can happen so probably better to expect everything.
Yes there is, has anything changed since the last ETF denial? You guys are all falling for yet another meme

The reasons the SEC gave for turning down previous applications have not changed one single bit in principle. 

There is no reason for the SEC to take a risk by approving one. 

You won't see me complaining if it happens. I really cannot see how they'll permit it this time around when nothing's different. 
They got a date again for a decision deadline. Gives people hope
Here is the argument..
https://bitcoinist.com/3-reasons-sec-bitcoin-etf-next-month/
because of the words you used
Apparently not hahah
Good day to scalp small bounces as long as the volume stays low this should continue.
Thursday salt is the best
Try to short it and you may understand why
Because people are willing to buy the contracts at that price? Are you asking why people are asking to buy the contracts at that price? If so then it's probably due to the coinbase tweet
It's a derivative - specifically a futures contract. people are trading what they think it'll be worth at the time of expiration of the contract - not what it's worth now. 
lmao was gonna make this joke but didnt know how to fit it in. costs more on the gbp and euro pairs

btw, your "I'm going to manipulate bitcoin to the downside by borrowing other manipulators' bitcoin to drive the price down" quote is legendary, don't know if you realize how gold that was
In fact, careful analysis of Satoshi's writings has shown that he or she is a board certified dentist OR a dental hygienist (there is currently some disagreement in the dentacoin community about this and also Satoshi's flossing habbits.)
Exactly. There is an attitude here that denies evolution. Nothing stays the same. Yes BTC was first and yes it could be argued its the truest decentralised blockchain. It could also be argued its just become a traders gimp, which ironically is making BTC less useful and less decentralised. In fact how decentralised is it actually? Think about who mines BTC and who owns BTC. 
Because Bitcoin is the only inherently secure Crypto regardless of use case due to it's decentralization. A Blockchain is not inherently secure and is basically just a fancy new database but is worthless without a way to protect or secure the data inside of it. 

Bitcoin is inherently secure due to its vast network of decentralized nodes. Any level of centralization increases the probability of a 51% attack being successful which is not possible with Bitcoin blockchain. 

You should read the whitepaper written by Satoshi Nakamoto to understand the basics of the tech. Proof of work is the real innovation and that is tied to Bitcoin and it's decentralized nature. Not to mention the development team behind Bitcoin core is where the real brains and talent are. Shit coins/alts don't have the head start or market dominance of Bitcoin, the inherent security and immutability of Bitcoin, or the development team behind Bitcoin.
I guess if we just took a dip to see hesitantly if we wanted to go lower than its not necessarily bearish. The "dip the toe in the creek" Wyckoff thing. or is it take a step back before the leap? lol I forget all the analogies.

But the fact that we got rejected from $6800 after that and are now near the bottom again...really doesn't look too great
Yup I wrote a long reply and it didn't submit but basically yes it looks very similar except for the new low, which fucks everything up  
meh I'm pretty basic on what TA I use. Pretty much prioritize horizontal support/resistance. If we had just broken $13k (6 month high) would you not think things look pretty great?

Dismissing price action entirely because the market can be fickle/irrational is a great way to feel helpless and excuse yourself for not having a plan

You're talking about complex TA. There's pretty much 0 reason to dismiss *all* forms of historical market patterns. You use them whether you like it or not.

If I asked you the chances of bitcoin going to $1k tomorrow barring any disastrous news what would you say? You'd say...virtually 0%, right? I mean we all know there's literally less than a 0.0001% chance that the market would sell off to $1k tomorrow barring catastrophic news. 

Go make an up/down on bitmex for $1000 vs $36000 that expires in the next 48h and see how many people buy those contracts.

We all know markets don't move like that. There ya go, there's your undeniable TA. Just extrapolate to what degree you think is "undeniable" and you have the basis for all TA. The more complex it gets the less reliable it is but it's all useful and insightful nonetheless 
Let's maybe start here:  What do you think it is that I'm trying to outline in my original post?
No offense taken my bro! I knew what you meant, just bragging :P
I do it in Chicken Pad Thais. I get you. :-)
Unless you believe that holding longterm will lose you money (which I can't see a plausible argument for), of course you have to make gains during bears in order to outperform holding.

If you don't make gains, you've lost money, thus in a worse position than if you'd hodled (unless you break even, in which case you've wasted time trading). This seems really fundamentally, obviously true, am I missing something? 
No it isn't. The same argument cannot be made in reverse. Bitcoin's logarithmic trend is up and its intact ( green and purple lines). The burden is on the bears to break this 9 year trend. Literally on a fundamental sense what you said is completely wrong. It shows you did not understand my argument at all.
I don't think even that will cause it. I think tether imploding or something can do the trick. The bears had a lot of time to go to 3-4k levels but that window has passed. Logarithmically speaking, this bubble has not been anywhere near as massive as the one that formed from 2012-2014. 
Those are bullish ones..? And not on RSI?
Fair enough. I’m still learning about divs as well, so I appreciate the perspective.
> Exactly. The end of a bear market will usually be at or near the YTD low, right?

this is exactly why I'm not thinking the bottom is in. the best example of our last extended bear market is 2014, and they did not end near the YTD low- the low was ~$160 and they held support at around $215 for most of 2015.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/AmXoKzBZ/

that's a 34% increase from the bottom, so if $6k is our "support" then $4.5k would be the capitulation wick downwards- assuming $4.5k is the lowest low we'll get and $6k is the support we found. 
I love halloumi and often grill it too! I might indeed pick some up on the way! :)
Chicken is not considered meat. Most jews will even combine it with milky things.

Soft bigotry of low expectations. They're uncontested (for the most part) in the US. 

Just because they're "noob friendly" and "haven't been hacked" doesn't mean they're not doing a piss poor job in every other category.

It's laughable that you can't see what's plainly obvious. I can't even count the number of fuckups they've had over the past year alone.
They're business decisions are complete failures and Brian Armstrong is borderline a bad/nefarious person. The reason they have a monopoly is because of regulatory framework, plenty of non-US options for those who don't need/want US based and first mover advantage. 

Volume and interest in Bitcoin / crypto is abysmal right now (which is why they keep releasing these bullshit press releases [they're trying to stay relevant and keep the revenue flowing]). When the next wave of bullishness kicks in, renewed pressure will emerge and more capable companies will emerge. There's already a lot going on behind the scenes and there are other options. I used to think Gemini would take advantage of low-approval of Coinbase but that doesn't seem to be happening and Gemini has its own set of issues. 

The best we can hope for is an innovative and robust exchange like Bitfinex to open shop on US soil, in all 50 states, and be subject to the same regulations that govern other regulated institutions. Coinbase is not positioned to do this anyway, they've demonstrated engineering ineptitude on multiple occasions and, like I said, Brian Armstrong is working *against* the success of Bitcoin in a lot of ways. 
Haha yeah basically just MAs represented by fancy colors 
Not exactly, but almost ;) Both Tenkan and Kijun adds the highest high and the lowest low and divides it by 2. On the "double settings" that are often used for crypto, Tekan does this over 20 time per, and Kijun over 60 time periods.

The actual cloud itself is then a formula based on Tenkan and Kijun divided by 2, and then plotted 30 time periods ahead of price.
A hedge means you reduce your  exposure to an asset to neutral. If you have $10 in bitcoin that $10 fluctuates with bitcoins price. Goes to $12k? it doubles, goes to $3k? it halves.

If you short $10 worth of bitcoin while still holding the bitcoin itself, you've hedged yourself because you make money and lose money whenever the price goes up or down. As in, you are flat.
Comes from Tom Lee on one of his recent appearances
I believe they will receive a mix of FIAT/BTC/BCASH. sure, some them will sell.
"However, I think a downturn in traditional markets will only hurt a BTC bullrun. I don't think it will affect it much if we continue this bear market, as I don't think large firms have a huge stake in BTC"

However it is retail investors who make up the vast majority of crypto markets as it stands, and I'd think it highly likely they would sell en masse if an economic downturn began. 

Speculative assets are the first to be hit and get hit the hardest, I don't see why crypto would be treated any differently.
It's a way of stopping bots I think. First time I've actually used strawpoll. 
Are you on mobile? I just had to click "I'm not a robot." like the one in [this article](https://www.wired.com/2014/12/google-one-click-recaptcha/). (I'm on desktop chrome if that matters.)
First of all, I'm not OP, so I haven't made any assumptions (and even OP didn't make any - only said this range seems reasonable). 

Anyway, I'm not saying it's a *negligible* difference, but I don't see how 5.8-7 is totally reasonable but 4-7 is "bizarre". $4k would be disappointing, and prolong things, but I don't see why it would necessarily cause such a panic as to inevitably lead to lower prices.

Again, I'm not saying OP is right and you're wrong, just that characterizing OP's post as "bizzare" seems like extreme language, and was wondering what your thinking was. Whatever. This is a dumb thread. 
lemma see ya chart
And even though Gox also scared away normies:


1) There were a LOT more normies this time (both in absolute numbers and percentage wise), so the effect would at least plausibly be larger

2) The lesson of Gox was limited to not trusting any single exchange, and being more critical of "too big to fail" exchanges. The loss of confidence this time is market wide, and can't be attributed to any one source. So even non-normies have some rational reason to avoid the entire Bitcoin market

Again, there's an argument to be made. Not sure how strong an argument it is, but it's there. 
"2014 bear market was started when China started to regulate/ban Bitcoin." It was both lol, that just makes my argument stronger. ALSO i said "fueled the bear market". not started it

Gov't regulation and bans from Google, FB, and Twitter..... thats not even remotely close are you ok?

News has mostly been very negative this year. errmmm what...
Well, I don't regard 2013 as part of the trend. 
I tend to agree although two things have changed somewhat:

1. This latest ETF proposal comes with insurance protection (apparently one of the big issues the SEC had with earlier proposals)
2. There is more clarity on crypto regulation now than there was before (e.g. SEC confirming BTC is not a security, the various things Japan and SK govs are doing)

Regardless, I think this latest ETF meme will still be a pump and sells the news affair. Even if it gains approval, it wont come on-line until Q1 2019.
lol what's so hard to understand what I'm saying. Trade what you see, not what you think.
You’re prob right, though I typically stop scalping once the bollinger bands start tightening up and we wind up for a big move. The r/r is just not worth it for me unless I’m pretty convinced of the direction.
TY some random shower thoughts. RN, i have the following:

which option would you pick:

* option A: One non leveraged trade per hour and an oracle giving you the price at the top of next hour, each hour

* option B: Unlimited leverage trades and the oracle giving you just the price direction at the  top of each hour. 
If you understood the basics of the tech you would have answers to all your own questions. It's completely decentralized. The miners are paid/ rewarded in Bitcoin or token for hashing or mining blocks, that is their incentive. The vast array of decentralized nodes are what provides security from a 51% attack and immutability to the record. It was created and released open source and has no known owner creator or single point of failure. I own Bitcoin, anyone can OWN Bitcoin, but no one group controls BTC like you are implying.


Progress is not something anyone is arguing I for one believe the dev team behind Bitcoin will continue to improve and innovate with the technology and they have already shown which coin they back. I do not think an alt/ shitcoin that is worse than Bitcoin in these key areas will ever possibly supplant it. No other coin has a dev team as strong or deep or skilled as core , is secure as Bitcoin, and Bitcoin is already king.
You know, we're basically as far from 6.8 as from 5.7 now ;-)

Rejection from 6.8 was bearish but higher low wasn't. I said we won't break 6.8 at first shot but until we're above 6k I don't think we may count on new low.
I'll deny it, that's just probability. Those coin flip charts which are supposed to look like a market, you could make the same arguments using those (no way we get back to only net+1000 heads in 48h), and that can't be TA.

Don't confuse TA with what you think is intuitive.
https://www.tradingview.com/x/ZjTB8Ygc/
Euro broke a yearly low, wasn't very bearish.
That "now" is a special moment. But I don't see how it is any different from a week (or month) ago in regards to the distance from the trendline compared to 2014.
Yes, you are missing that since a bear market is going down, hodling is losing money, thus the trader need only lose less money during a bear market to come out ahead. During a bull market the trader needs to make more than the hodler to come out ahead. One can switch from trader to holder (or leverage longer) depending on the market cycle.
Oil me up. 
Actually, it kind of was more so. 

The increase from $200 to $20k would have been like an increase from $10 to $1000 back then. Bitcoin was worth well over $10 for much of 2011. The bubble really started at $200 in September 2013.  That was a bubble from $200 to $1100. 

2017 was more like $1800 to $20k or $3900 to $20k depending on your timeframe. 
What timeframe are you giving this market until we're at confirmed lows? Just wondering. Appreciate your responses by the way!
Yes. Price made a higher low but oscillators made a lower low. That's a hidden bullish divergence. Reason why I said I'm watching is because price could start going lower and match the oscillator and it'd be invalidated. So it needs to be confirmed still.
I don't remember it that clearly anymore (it was 4 years ago, after all), but we didn't spend long at all below $200.  The way I remember it was that it lasted a couple of minutes, this chart seems to indicate it was more like a day or two?

Either way, I think you're digging a little bit deep to think that a two day period in 2014 invalidates our current standing in 2018
We hadn't done much at $200 at this point in 2014. $320 or so in 2014 is closer to our $6000. 
It absolutely is meat to most vegetarians.
> innovative and robust exchange like Bitfinex

You're joking, right?

You're railing against Coinbase (and there's a grain of truth to your arguments, though you're blowing it out of proportion by an order of magnitude)...and...your counterexample is *Bitfinex*? You might as well have used Mt. Gox. The only thing Bitfinex is likely to innovate would be a new way to give its customers a haircut.
So hedging means pretty much you go into position and expecting it to go in your favor correct? Pretty much going from fiat to currency
I think I disagree that they'd sell. We're already down 70% from ATH, so if any of those investors are still here then they're at the point where they just don't care. The reason why speculative assets get hit the hardest is because those large firms start selling them off as they need the liquidity to stay afloat in other places. But I'm assuming they aren't even in the market right now.
Yeah but the real goal behind capcha is training machine vision algorithms.
Desktop. I must be dodgy.
> This is a dumb thread.

You nailed it :)
I am trading this 6200 range and buying a bit every day when market is up https://www.tradingview.com/x/Me8O10GQ
> It was both

No, it wasn't both.  It was started when China started to regulate/ban Bitcoin.  That is one event, not two.

> Gov't regulation and bans from Google, FB, and Twitter..... thats not even remotely close are you ok?

Are you ok?  Because it's actually worse than Gox on a fundamental level.



Interesting, thanks. I read through the other ETF denial and it seemed a large worry was over manipulation over the markets. None of that has been assuaged, right? 
>lol what's so hard to understand what I'm saying.

"If you think the price will go lower, you should be going long now. I'm short and I think there are good odds of the price going lower. But, yeah, go long now." 
It's getting sketchy. Yesterday and day before were all clear days for scalping in hindsight. Im gambling that volume continues to stay low but I am also going to stop very soon. One or two more successful scalps then im done for the day.
in option B, if you're, say, long, she could tell you it's going to be going up at the 60th minute of the hour, but the price could tank disastrously the first 59 minutes?

if I have unlimited leveraged trades then I'd just need a lucky streak of 100x's to make more than I could make over a small period of time than with the non-leveraged trade. but the non-leveraged trade would compound significantly over time...I guess I'd go with option A because it's guaranteed returns that end up being infinite money anyway 

I have a very basic knowledge of the tech for sure. Then again does anyone know how their smartphone works despite still using it?

The point I was trying to make not very eloquently was that although the tech makes it more decentralised than some others, the way it is predominantly used right now isn't necessarily what it was designed to be. Which is the case for most crypto currencies. There are though some projects which are on varying scales of decentralisation which are being used to improve systems and provide greater control to the individual. The other point is that BTC  was first. What this means is that something else will come along that's better. I just find it strange that some people cannot see this.
This isn't a higher low, we're at a lower low now. I don't do "higher low" based on the lowest low of the year because that's useless :P 

Unless we're literally making new lows the second you evaluate that that will always be true. 

The higher low was $6400 and we have firmly broken below it- we are definitively in the "bearish" side of this range and $6400 is yet again resistance. Keep in mind $6450 was the April low...so we are below a long term low 
I mean...yet. (just like bitcoin)

plus yearly low for an asset like the euro vs btc is different considering the rate with which a currency moves vs which bitcoin moves. Not to mention the euro has plenty of reasons to move up/down and recover. Bitcoin is primarily speculative. I'm hesitant to compare such a speculative asset to the euro. The euro has never been a bubble like asset

How is it probability? Is $1000 as likely as $5000 tomorrow? No. if you think so...I'm not sure you should be trading 

Bubble pops look very similar and btc has looked very much like a typical bubble pop so far. Of course it's not an exact thing down to the dollar but ignoring historical market movements based on similar assets is pretty much giving away free money. If I listened to people who say TA is bunk and ignored it entirely I'd have a lot less money than I do right now

Feel free to do your thing but I've yet to find a good reason to ignore *all* forms of TA including the most basic ones like % ATH and horizontal support/resistance
This is not at all what I'm attempting to say. 

I'm simply posting a few long scale view charts to help temper price expectations and how they might manifest as supported by prior bubble patterns.  I wrote more in a post below if you care to take a look.  I'm happy for people to disagree or make evidence based counterclaims. 
If you have $100 worth of BTC and hodl as price bulls up 10x ($1000), followed by bearing down 2x ($500), you have 5x worth your original investment, or $500.

If you instead hodl during bull and lose 10% attempting to trade during bear, you end up with $450.

Obviously if you gain during bear you're better off, but that is not a guarantee. How is hodling not a better strategy if you want to guarantee not losing? 
yes i think you're right, but I think what I meant and did not word correctly at all is that 2014 strayed much further up from the purple/green log trend lines than 2018 did. If Bitcoin breaches these lines then the 9 year trend will be broken which I think is unlikely unless a significant sell off occurs.
I think we'll see the bottom before end of September. I really doubt 5755 was the bottom but it could be. I'm slowly starting to doubt if we can even breach 5200 by this point. It should have already happened.
I think it was a few days, yeah. And I'd think so too if there were literally 1 time in the history of btc that  it ever recovered off a flat bottom instead of a capitulation wick 
I don't remember the price being down below $200 for more than a few minutes either.
I meant 2015! I just say 2014 to refer to the 2014-2015 bear market haha
LOL! Bitfinex's interface, order options and API are miles above anything else I'm aware of. Coinbase isn't even close.

Even Tether itself is innovative and first of its kind.

What about Bitfinex *isn't* innovative? They're almost always on the forefront. They were also one of the first big exchanges to implement Segwit.

How long did it take Coinbase to implement Segwit?...

Hmmm..
No it means you are removing yourself from the market essentially.

If it goes up, you don't make or lose any money. if it goes down, you don't make or lose any money.

Hedging a long = opening a short (or selling)

hedging a short = opening a long/buying.

Hedging can also refer to a *speculative attempt* to reduce exposure to the markets.

If you believe two assets are inversely correlated, you can "hedge" by buying one that tends to be more successful when the other is performing poorly. Some people "hedge" their traditional stocks/investments with a more speculative one that performs better during market downturns, e.g. gold 
The simple version of hedging translates to: I'm taking a position that will preserve the fiat value of all my BTC regardless of what direction the market moves.

If the price goes up I'll have less BTC, but the total fiat value of my holdings remain.

If the price goes down I'll have more BTC, but the total fiat value of my holdings remain.
:) 
One way to reduce manipulation is to increase liquidity. It’s chicken or the egg - how do we increase participation by institutions who will introduce liquidity thereby reducing the impact of attempted manipulation if we prevent them from doing just that? I’m not an expert on the ETF space,  but my understating (I’ve been told matter of factly) is that there are examples of existing ETFs that are susceptible to manipulation other than BTC, will see if I can find some examples. 
Like others are saying, it is to a certain extent a chicken and egg problem. I guess the question is whether or not the SEC will decide enough exchanges have now gotten serious with AML/KYC and whether or not they believe crypto regulations in other jurisdictions are now sufficiently developed.

If yes, they may decide to approve CBOE's proposal and hope doing so contributes to weakening market manipulation.
My interpretation was "Now is ultimately a good time to go long. I think it might go down further, but probably not very much, so I'm keeping a short as a hedge, but for the most part am long" which seems likely a reasonable point of view to me?
Yeah, I live for this kind of price action, but I don’t like scalping on the weekends or when volatility gets too low, as it’s simply not worth it. I’m in the same boat as you though, I guess I’m more of an “in and out” trader since I typically stick to 1-2 trades per day max.
Any conservative trader would go with A. Option B tells you just current hour's candle color so you can get wicked in-between.
" Then again does anyone know how their smartphone works despite still using it?" 

Fair, but you also don't argue known facts about your cell phone either. You know a text sends a text. You understand how area codes and dialing basic functions work. This is a basic function of Bitcoin I am discussing.

". The other point is that BTC was first. What this means is that something else will come along that's better. I just find it strange that some people cannot see this."

Or Bitcoin will develop into the better version of itself that you are describing. Why does it have to be some other form or Alt? Also what you are saying about decentralization is false. Bitcoin is decentralized period. Any "varying scale of decentralization" = a level of centralization. That's not something you can argue and the statement that "the tech is more decentralized than some others (when ref. Bitcoin) is also facetious. Any level of centralization is less secure than fully decentralized period. 

I think you were implying that miner centralization has anything to do with the decentralized nature of the Bitcoin network which is also false. The Bitcoin network is secured by the vast array of decentralized nodes that you or I anyone can create and host. Miners cannot force a hard fork or create new rules they can only suggest them and consensus of nodes rules. It's funny you mention miner centralization as a problem when that's already an issue Bitcoin is solving due to it's decentralization and node consensus. Also you fail to realize that it also proves that Bitcoin is being developed and will become the crypto you seem to think will replace it.


If we're talking about the bottom of bear we should be looking for the lowest point and that is 5.7 now.
If between today and tomorrow there are 10,000 coin-flips you can make draw a bellcurve and predict how likely each heads to tails ratio is. The further from 1:1 the less likely, bigger changes are less likely. 

> Is $1000 as likely as $5000 tomorrow? No

Of course not but you used 'likely', the above is to illustrate that no technicals are required to come to that conclusion. There is no edge in that conclusion either.

I'm not the initial TA denier btw, I very much enjoy TA. I just thought your reasoning was flawed.

TA works the same for all markets, the comparison of the kind of asset is a fundamental consideration, you should only need to look at the charts to come to conclusions (If only using TA). 

Euro/usd is not btc/usd and I don't want to suggest the behaviour will be the same, just that a new 6 month low suggesting down is oversimplified.

Another example and obviously the technical are different, but I want to share it anyway. https://www.tradingview.com/x/ZvU7SFpW/

While It's not my style, many people consider S/R only broken if price closes over the line. In the euro chart the monthly failed to close and currently the BTC weekly hasn't closed below the previous low. Maybe that's something to take into consideration in regards to your initial comment.




Sorry, I misread the title as: "We are now in terms of percentage distance from the long term support line as compared to 2014/2015 bear market"
How would someone who sold lose during a 50% decline? Lets say they sold when the trend change confirmed at $700. They have to do a lot of bad trading to end up with $450. They can buy in any time between 500–700 and come out ahead. They also gave themselves a potential opportunity to rebuy at historic decline levels of 70-80%.
Your example comparing $6k in 2018 to $215 in 2015 is what threw me. But I get you. 
Coinbase innovated a way to *not* steal 30% of all customers' funds overnight.

Coinbase has a legitimate U.S. presence and known principals, both of which can be held legally accountable should the worst occur (at least much more so than a BVI/Taiwan entity, or whatever fly-by-night jurisdiction Bitfinex is in these days).

Coinbase didn't/doesn't cause 10%+ crashes when they have unscheduled downtime (which happened at least a couple of times to Bitfinex in 2015/2016).

Coinbase is user-friendly enough for noobs, while also being regulated and reputable enough for institutional clients (Bitfinex is neither).

Did I mention the 30% haircut? Oh, and the fact that all this time later, we *still* don't know who committed the theft, exactly how and how much, or whether there really even was a theft and proper investigation.

Hmmm....

P.S.: Tether car wash tokens are a cancer on the crypto ecosystem; why you would bring that up as a "plus" is beyond me.
You’re a patient man. I would’ve just said fuckin google it or read a text book. 
You are very nice, sloppy. 
Still, it sounds like he's suggesting that others go long while he's still holding onto his short. If now's a good time to buy, it doesn't make sense why he'd even be hedged at the moment.
If someone is short, then they aren't long....for the most part or a minor part or a medium part.
Right but you said higher low- we do not have a higher low. The higher low would have been above $6400. We bounced off it twice and then fell through. there is no higher low now. 

Unless you consider everything above $5750 (or whatever it was) a higher low. 

personally I do not do that, because it's useless. We could be at $5751 and it'd technically be a higher low lol. 

Higher lows have to be in terms of former price movements to lows. We dipped to $6415 after $6600 then went to $6800. The higher low would be > $6415 
> the above is to illustrate that no technicals are required to come to that conclusion. 

I'm arguing that technical analysis is based off of and extrapolated from that conclusion. It is, essentially, based off of fundamental truths like "it is extremely unlikely that bitcoin will be $1000 tomorrow"
I agree it's likely you'd make more money if you have halfway decent trading skills, but many people make terrible decisions. If you want to *guarantee* not losing money, hodling long term is best.

Anyway, I think this conversation has probably run its course into diminishing returns. Congrats to us on maintaining civil discourse! 
Yea mb wrote it a little confusing
You're conflating security with innovation. I never said that they didn't have their issues. I said that they on the forefront of innovation and appear to be doing thing conducive to growing the space as opposed to crashing it like coinbase. 

Remember the whole BCash / insider trading fiasco? Funny how that corresponded with the beginning of the bear market, yeah? I don't remember bitfinex triggering a bear market...

Hmmm...

How about the fact that their charts didn't work for the longest time. Literally they couldn't get a non-configurablw chart to work on their site for several weeks. A fucking chart.

Coinbase is a joke. Easily the worst of the big exchanges. Sorry this pisses you off so much to hear.

:/
lol I like explaining things I understand to test my own understanding- if I try to explain them and fail to explain them in an intuitive way, then I figure I should probably go google it myself. 
Haha, not that nice. :P 
I don't like to get fucked that's why
Ok - for the record I'm a noob and have a lot to learn. Is it not possible to have a short and long open at the same time? If so, and if your long position is larger than your short, how would you describe that situation?

Sorry if this is too dumb to even respond to - if you could provide a link with explanatory info that'd be appreciated, but no worries if not worth your time.

Didn't mean to sound authoritative, just trying to learn. 
I don't get your point of view. We dipped to 5.7, bounced from 6.8 and then from above 6k. For me this is a higher low.
Do you treat lower highs the same way? 
My belief is that It's based on supply, demand and liquidity. If it works it must be able to be extrapolated back to some universal laws. Stating similarities between truths and TA isn't good enough unless you can show how those truths can result in an edge. 

I think this comment is quite nice and it takes a similar angle that you are.

https://www.reddit.com/r/Forex/comments/8mbgja/i_dont_understand_technical_analysis/dzndnbd/
No I feel you. I do that myself sometimes, mostly I explain stuff back to myself while taking a shower and if I fail I go back and read on it. 
Well, patiently explained 101  concepts, thats nice. Or you are super bored. 
Yeah, I understand. It’s just ironic.
On the way up to $10k the first time would you consider $9.3k a lower high? Is that a helpful metric? Imo no. There will always be pullbacks and bounces.

So I don't use that metric for defining "higher lows" and "lower highs" because it's useless

This will be a "higher low" until it makes a new low. And then that metric is useless

Technically we are making lower highs for 6 months now. In a much more meaningful way than a 2% difference

My point is ($lowest_price_of_the_year + 1) is a higher low. 

We could literally dump to $3k and go to $3002 then go down to $3001 and it'd be a higher low. Lol 

But if we did $3000 to $3700 to $3300 to $3700 to $3500 that'd be a higher low. 

$3000 to $3700 to $3300 to $3700 to $3200...that's a higher low to you but not to me...

That doesn't mean things are bullish, it's a silly way of looking at it 
Why wouldn't I? o_O  I just explained that I don't, lol. 

There were plenty of those useless "lower highs" on the way to ATH. you'd get rekt every single time if you tried to short it because it wasn't at a literal ATH. it's a useless metric 
lately I'm too busy re-watching battlestar galactica in the shower :P
Maybe a bit of both :D 
It's two different kind of trades. I already made my profit on my short. I don't mind giving some back here if I can get a good large entry that might settle me for a couple of days/weeks because that's the setup I'm seeing. But I also don't want to have a big losing trade if it would break down completely. I always trade on x10 leverage so I have to be careful. 


The lower it goes from here, the more I buy. So I'm fine with being underwater for some time, that's why I keep my short. 
I think it's just about the time frame you use. If we go down to 1d and look at our drop from 10k then it's basically first time we made higher low after bouncing off resistance, every other time we made new low, so this one is higher low on this whole drop.
read the part I edited with the $3k example it explains it 

also that's to be expected with a new range. On our drop from $13k we tested $12.7k then $12.8k a few times before dumping all the way to $9k 

Sometimes we dip our feet in the new range before dumping through it 
Ok, I get you. My point is that every time since 10k it was new low -> resistance -> new low. This time there was no new low, that's why I say it's higher low. Maybe I should say higher local low?
Yes I get what you're saying, I just don't think it's bullish, it's more like neutral/leaning bearish. 

And I don't think we were going to continue that pattern downwards forever, haha that  would be a very aggressive downtrend. 
That's the point. For me getting to 6.5 on this bounce is enough. 15% profit on trading stack works for me. Don't care if this low is local or long term...
